Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,186
Emergency care at scene of emergency; persons relieved of civil liability, when.

(1) No person who renders emergency care at the scene of an accident or other emergency gratuitously, shall be held liable for any civil damages as a result of any act or omission by such person in rendering the emergency care or as a result of any act or failure to act to provide or arrange for medical treatment or care for the injured person.

(2) For purposes of this section, rendering emergency care at the scene of an accident or other emergency includes entering a motor vehicle to remove a child when entering the vehicle and removing the child is necessary to avoid immediate harm to the child.

Laws 1961, c. 110, § 1, p. 349;

Laws 1971, LB 458, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1979), § 25-1152;

Laws 2020, LB832, § 1.

This section does not apply to a police officer responding to the scene of an automobile accident because his conduct was not gratuitous. Drake v. Drake, 260 Neb. 530, 618 N.W.2d 650 (2000).